District of Columbia statutes.
21-112

Suits by ancillary guardian.

(a)

Upon the granting of ancillary letters, the guardian may institute and prosecute to judgment any action in the courts of the District of Columbia, take possession of all property of his ward, and collect and receive all moneys belonging and due to him therein, give full receipt and acquittances for debts, and release all claims, liens, and mortgages belonging to the ward, on property in the District of Columbia, in the same manner as if his authority had been originally conferred by the Probate Court.

(b)

The guardian shall give security for the costs which may accrue in an action brought by him, in the same manner as other nonresidents bringing suit in the courts of the District.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 740, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 567, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 150(a)(1)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-112.
1973 Ed., § 21-112.